Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 8

Certiorari and Supersedeas

27-8-101. Constitutional basis.

The writ of certiorari may be granted whenever authorized by law, and also in all cases where an inferior tribunal, board, or officer exercising judicial functions has exceeded the jurisdiction conferred, or is acting illegally, when, in the judgment of the court, there is no other plain, speedy, or adequate remedy. This section does not apply to actions governed by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Code 1858, § 3123 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 10); Shan., § 4853; Code 1932, § 8989; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-801; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 10.

Cross-References. Certiorari against invalid distress warrant, §67-4-109(b).

Clerk's fees, §8-21-401.

Review of boards and commissions, title 27, ch. 9.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 363.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 31; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, § 1; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 2, 3, 5, 9, 10, 11, 18, 40, 59; 10 Tenn. Juris., Employer and Employee § 5; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 26; 14 Tenn. Juris., Habeas Corpus, § 11; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 9; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 41, 42.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 733.

Administrative Law — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Paul H. Sanders), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 940.

Administrative Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Val Sanford), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1115.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Appellate Procedure — Ripeness for Review by Appeal or Certiorari, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1033.

Constitutional Law — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 763.

Judicial Review of Administrative Action in Tennessee—Scope of Review, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 349.

Judicial Review under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act — An Update (Ben H. Cantrell), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 589 (1984).

Methods of Judicial Review over Administrative Actions in Tennessee, 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 657 (1984).

Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1108.

Procedure and Evidence — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1281.

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1353.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben H. Cantrell), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 19.

Tennessee Appellate Procedure and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (William J. Harbison), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 291.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

The Pre-Hearing Stage of Contested Cases under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (L. Harold Levinson), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 465 (1984).

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, II. Initiation of An Appeal (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 4.

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions in Tennessee (William H. Ewing, Jr.), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. LeClercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

The Tennessee Department of Revenue and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Mike Norton), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 303.

The Theoretical Foundations of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, III. Some Noteworthy Features of the Rules (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 180.

Attorney General Opinions. State's remedies to prevent general sessions court from improperly reducing a criminal offense, OAG 88-80, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 74 (4/7/88).

The statutory writ of certiorari is a process for obtaining judicial review of an inferior tribunal’s decisions, and the writ process itself does not create or constitute any substantive legal cause of action. OAG 15-09, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (2/2/15).

27-8-102. Cases in which writ lies.

Certiorari lies:

On suggestion of diminution;

Where no appeal is given;

As a substitute for appeal;

Instead of audita querela; or

Instead of writ of error.

This section does not apply to actions governed by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Code 1858, § 3124; Shan., § 4854; Code 1932, § 8990; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-802; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 10.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 363.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 10, 25, 40, 59.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Val Sanford), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1115.

Appellate Procedure — Ripeness for Review by Appeal or Certiorari, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1033.

Judicial Review and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Toxey H. Sewell), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 253.

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben H. Cantrell), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 19.

The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions in Tennessee (William H. Ewing, Jr.), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 144.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

The Tennessee Law of Real Estate Broker Licensing (Lewis L. Laska), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 457.

27-8-103. Levy not required.

It is not necessary that a levy shall be made on the defendant's property in order to entitle the defendant to the writ of certiorari and supersedeas.

Acts 1877, ch. 132, § 1; Shan., § 4855; Code 1932, § 8990a; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-803.

27-8-104. Power of circuit and chancery courts.

The judges of the inferior courts of law have the power, in all civil cases, to issue writs of certiorari to remove any cause or transcript thereof from any inferior jurisdiction, on sufficient cause, supported by oath or affirmation.

The chancellors shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the judges of the circuit courts of this state in granting writs of certiorari and supersedeas removing causes from general sessions courts to the circuit courts.

Code 1858, § 3126 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 10); Acts 1877, ch. 64; Shan., § 4857; Code 1932, § 8992; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-804.

Cross-References. Commission's power to petition for judicial jurisdiction, §62-19-127.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 41; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 41.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

27-8-105. Power of general sessions judges.

Two (2) general sessions judges may, within twenty (20) days after judgment, grant a certiorari and supersedeas to remove the proceedings of a general sessions judge to the circuit court.

Code 1858, § 3127 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 7, § 4; 1833, ch. 65, § 2); Shan., § 4858; Code 1932, § 8993; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-805.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 31, 34, 36; 22 Tenn. Juris., Removal of Causes, § 8.

27-8-106. Petition.

The petition for certiorari may be sworn to before the clerk of the circuit court, the judge, any judge of the court of general sessions, or a notary public, and shall state that it is the first application for the writ.

Code 1858, § 3128 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 65, § 1); Shan., § 4859; mod. Code 1932, § 8994; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-806.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 34, 37, 41; 20 Tenn. Juris., Notary Public, § 1.

27-8-107. Return to circuit courts.

All writs of certiorari and supersedeas granted to revise the proceedings of the county court, or any general sessions judge, shall be made returnable to the circuit court unless otherwise expressly provided by law.

Code 1858, § 3125; Shan., § 4856; Code 1932, § 8991; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-807.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 46.

27-8-108. Amount of supersedeas.

Where the error complained of is in the amount of the judgment, the petition shall show the amount of the mistake, and the supersedeas shall not issue for more than such amount, and the plaintiff in the judgment shall be entitled to execution for the balance not complained of, as if no such writ had been obtained.

Code 1858, § 3129 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 26, § 1; 1829, ch. 16, § 1); Shan., § 4860; Code 1932, § 8995; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-808.

27-8-109. Part of judgment involved.

When the certiorari extends only to a part of the judgment, or it is brought by one (1) or more of several parties only, a certified copy of the proceedings complained of shall be made out by the proper officer, and filed in lieu of the original papers, and proceedings as to parties who do not join in the application shall not be affected.

Code 1858, § 3130 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 26, § 3); Shan., § 4861; Code 1932, § 8996; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-809.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 57.

27-8-110. Prosecution bond.

The clerk of the circuit court, before such clerk issues the writ, shall take bond from the party applying, with good security, in double the amount of the judgment or error complained of, payable to the opposite party, conditioned to prosecute the writ with effect, or perform the judgment which shall be rendered in the cause.

Code 1858, § 3131 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 81, § 1); Shan., § 4862; Code 1932, § 8997; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-810.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 49-52; 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs § 64.

27-8-111. Security for costs.

The original plaintiff, upon certiorari to a higher court, may be ruled to give security for the costs of suit in such higher court.

Code 1858, § 3139; Shan., § 4870; Code 1932, § 9007; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-811.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 52.

27-8-112. Supersedeas.

The clerk shall also issue a writ of supersedeas in all necessary cases, directed to the opposite party, or the officer in whose hands the execution may be, which shall effectually supersede all further proceedings thereon.

Code 1858, § 3132; Shan., § 4863; Code 1932, § 8998; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-812.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees, §8-21-401.

Powers of Supreme Court judges, §16-3-205.

Supersedeas against tax collection prohibited, §67-1-909.

27-8-113. Supersedeas on pauper's application.

No supersedeas shall issue upon application in forma pauperis, without express order of the judge dispensing with security.

Such order may be made by the judge only on notice to the adverse party of the application.

Code 1858, § 3133; Shan., § 4864; Code 1932, § 8999; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-813.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, §§ 22, 49.

27-8-114. Action after refusal of supersedeas.

On refusing such order, the judge may either take bond from the adverse party for the payment of damages, including the value of property levied on, or for the safekeeping of the property and its redelivery at the end of the suit, with damages, if the applicant succeeds in the application; or, the judge may order the property to be kept by the officer, and take bond from the plaintiff for damages only; or, if the property is such as to render it proper, or if the applicant consents, the judge may order the sale to proceed and take bond from the plaintiff for payment of damages; or, the judge may make such other order as the parties may agree on or the circumstances justify.

In such case, no further notice shall be required to bring the parties into court.

Code 1858, §§ 3134, 3135; Shan., §§ 4865, 4866; Code 1932, §§ 9000, 9001; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-814.

27-8-115. Time of trial.

Suits brought into an appellate court, by writ of certiorari, shall be triable at the return term of the writ.

Acts 1903, ch. 115, § 1; Shan., § 4866a1; Code 1932, § 9002; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-815.

27-8-116. Determination on motion to quash or dismiss.

On motion to quash or dismiss a writ of certiorari granted in lieu of an appeal, issue may be taken and proof heard upon the facts alleged in the petition as ground for not appealing, which issue shall thereupon be determined by the court.

Acts 1903, ch. 115, § 2; Shan., § 4866a2; Code 1932, § 9003; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-816.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 48.

27-8-117. Judgment for applicant.

On the final judgment, the court may, if the applicant obtain relief, direct the jury trying the cause to assess damages, or may impanel a jury for that purpose, may order restitution of the property, or give such other judgment in the applicant's favor as the state of the case requires.

Code 1858, § 3136; Shan., § 4867; Code 1932, § 9004; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-817.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 61.

27-8-118. Judgment against applicant.

Upon affirmance of the judgment or decree below or recovery of a larger amount, or upon dismissal of the certiorari for want of prosecution, or for any other cause, the court shall enter judgment for the amount recovered against the principal and the sureties on the prosecution bond, with interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum from the date of the judgment or decree below, and all costs.

In all other cases, the judgment of the higher court, if against the party obtaining the certiorari, shall be for the amount of the recovery, with interest and costs, against the principal and sureties to the prosecution bond.

Code 1858, §§ 3137, 3138 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 64; 1817, ch. 119, § 2); impl. am. Acts 1861 (1st E. S.), ch. 6, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1865-1866, ch. 17, § 1; Shan., §§ 4868, 4869; Code 1932, §§ 9005, 9006; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-818.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 240; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 63; 16 Tenn. Juris., Interest § 7.